California statutes. Vehicle Code
(b) The term “transporter” does not include a person engaged in the business of operating a tow car.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 444.)
-------------------------------------------

650.

A “trolley coach” is a vehicle which is propelled by electric power obtained from overhead trolley wires, but not operated upon rails.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

655.

(a) A “truck tractor” is a motor vehicle designed and used primarily for drawing other vehicles and not so constructed as to carry a load, other than a part of the weight of the vehicle and the load so drawn. As used in this section, “load” does not include items carried on the truck tractor in conjunction with the operation of the vehicle if the load carrying space for these items does not exceed 34 square feet.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a truck tractor, operated by a motor carrier whose owner is licensed by the Department of the California Highway Patrol to transport explosives pursuant to Division 14 (commencing with Section 31600), may be equipped with a cargo container used exclusively for the transportation of explosives or munitions-related security material, as specified by the United States Department of Defense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 88, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

657.

A “truss” is an assemblage of beams, bars, or rods typically arranged in a triangle or combination of triangles to form a rigid framework and used as a structural support in buildings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

660.

The “unladen weight” of a vehicle is the weight equipped and ready for operation on the road including the body, fenders, oil in motor, radiator full of water, with five gallons of gasoline or equivalent weight of other motor fuel; also equipment required by law, and unless exempted under Section 66l, any special cabinets, boxes or body parts permanently attached to the vehicle, and any machinery, equipment or attachment which is attendant to the efficient operation of the body or vehicle. Unladen weight shall not include any load or any machinery or mechanical apparatus, such as, but not limited to, wood saws, well-drilling machines, spray apparatus, tow truck cranes, and grinding equipment. The unladen weight of a vehicle shall have no application in determining any fee under this code or the Revenue and Taxation Code other than Section 9400.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 924, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

661.

Unladen weight shall not include the following machinery, equipment or attachment which is attendant to the efficient operation of the body or vehicle:

(a) Equipment used for loading, compacting, or unloading of refuse.

(b) Transitmix cement equipment.

(c) Temporary equipment used to contain or support the load which does not change the body classification.

(d) Any camper unit that is temporarily attached to a vehicle.

(e) Refrigeration equipment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2108.)
-------------------------------------------

665.

A “used vehicle” is a vehicle that has been sold, or has been registered with the department, or has been sold and operated upon the highways, or has been registered with the appropriate agency of authority, of any other state, District of Columbia, territory or possession of the United States or foreign state, province or country, or unregistered vehicles regularly used or operated as demonstrators in the sales work of a dealer or unregistered vehicles regularly used or operated by a manufacturer in the sales or distribution work of such manufacturer. The word “sold” does not include or extend to: (1) any sale made by a manufacturer or a distributor to a dealer, (2) any sale by a new motor vehicle dealer franchised to sell a particular line-make to another new motor vehicle dealer franchised to sell the same line-make, or (3) any sale by a dealer to another dealer licensed under this code involving a mobilehome, as defined in Section 396, a recreational vehicle, as defined in Section 18010.5 of the Health and Safety Code, a commercial coach, as defined in Section 18012 of the Health and Safety Code, an off-highway motor vehicle subject to identification, as defined in Section 38012, or a commercial vehicle, as defined in Section 260.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1583, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

665.5.

A “U-turn” is the turning of a vehicle upon a highway so as to proceed in the opposite direction whether accomplished by one continuous movement or not.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 620.)
-------------------------------------------

667.

(a) A “utility trailer” is a trailer or semitrailer used solely for the transportation of the user’s personal property, not in commerce, which does not exceed a gross weight of 10,000 pounds or a manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating of 10,000 pounds.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a “utility trailer” includes a trailer or semitrailer designed and used for the transportation of livestock, not in commerce, which does not exceed a gross weight of 10,000 pounds or a manufacturer’s gross vehicle weight rating of 10,000 pounds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 491, Sec. 35.   (SB 1318)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

668.

A “vanpool vehicle” is any motor vehicle, other than a motortruck or truck tractor, designed for carrying more than 10 but not more than 15 persons including the driver, which is maintained and used primarily for the nonprofit work-related transportation of adults for the purposes of ridesharing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 46, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

670.

A “vehicle” is a device by which any person or property may be propelled, moved, or drawn upon a highway, excepting a device moved exclusively by human power or used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 987.)
-------------------------------------------

670.5.

A “vehicle frame” is defined as the main longitudinal structural members of the chassis of the vehicle, or for vehicles with unitized body construction, the lowest main longitudinal structural members of the body of the vehicle, used as the major support in the construction of the motor vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 670, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

671.

(a) A “vehicle identification number” is the motor number, serial number, or other distinguishing number, letter, mark, character, or datum, or any combination thereof, required or employed by the manufacturer or the department for the purpose of uniquely identifying a motor vehicle or motor vehicle part or for the purpose of registration.

(b) Whenever a vehicle is constructed of component parts identified with one or more different vehicle identification numbers, the vehicle identification number stamped or affixed by the manufacturer or authorized governmental entity on the frame or unitized frame and body, as applicable, and as defined in Section 670.5, shall determine the identity of the vehicle for registration purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 670, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

672.

(a) “Vehicle manufacturer” is any person who produces from raw materials or new basic components a vehicle of a type subject to registration under this code, off-highway motorcycles or all-terrain vehicles subject to identification under this code, or trailers subject to identification pursuant to Section 5014.1, or who permanently alters, for purposes of retail sales, new commercial vehicles by converting the vehicles into house cars that display the insignia of approval required by Section 18056 of the Health and Safety Code and any regulations issued pursuant thereto by the Department of Housing and Community Development. As used in this section, “permanently alters” does not include the permanent attachment of a camper to a vehicle.

(b) A vehicle manufacturer that produces a vehicle of a type subject to registration that consists of used or reconditioned parts, for the purposes of the code, is a remanufacturer, as defined in Section 507.8.

(c) Unless a vehicle manufacturer either grants franchises to franchisees in this state, or issues vehicle warranties directly to franchisees in this state or consumers in this state, the manufacturer shall have an established place of business or a representative in this state.

(d) The scope and application of this section are limited to Division 2 (commencing with Section 1500) and Division 5 (commencing with Section 11100).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 836, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

675.

(a) “Vehicle salesperson” is a person not otherwise expressly excluded by this section, who does one or a combination of the following:

(1) Is employed as a salesperson by a dealer, as defined in Section 285, or who, under any form of contract, agreement, or arrangement with a dealer, for commission, money, profit, or other thing of value, sells, exchanges, buys, or offers for sale, negotiates, or attempts to negotiate, a sale, or exchange of an interest in a vehicle required to be registered under this code.

(2) Induces or attempts to induce any person to buy or exchange an interest in a vehicle required to be registered, and who receives or expects to receive a commission, money, brokerage fees, profit, or any other thing of value, from either the seller or purchaser of the vehicle.

(3) Exercises managerial control over the business of a licensed vehicle dealer or who supervises vehicle salespersons employed by a licensed dealer, whether compensated by salary or commission, including, but not limited to, any person who is employed by the dealer as a general manager, assistant general manager, or sales manager, or any employee of a licensed vehicle dealer who negotiates with or induces a customer to enter into a security agreement or purchase agreement or purchase order for the sale of a vehicle on behalf of the licensed vehicle dealer.

(b) The term “vehicle salesperson” does not include any of the following:

(1) Representatives of insurance companies, finance companies, or public officials, who in the regular course of business, are required to dispose of or sell vehicles under a contractual right or obligation of the employer, or in the performance of an official duty, or under the authority of any court of law, if the sale is for the purpose of saving the seller from any loss or pursuant to the authority of a court of competent jurisdiction.

(2) Persons who are licensed as a manufacturer, remanufacturer, transporter, distributor, or representative.

(3) Persons exclusively employed in a bona fide business of exporting vehicles, or of soliciting orders for the sale and delivery of vehicles outside the territorial limits of the United States.

(4) Persons not engaged in the purchase or sale of vehicles as a business, disposing of vehicles acquired for their own use, or for use in their business when the vehicles have been so acquired and used in good faith, and not for the purpose of avoiding the provisions of this code.

(5) Persons regularly employed as salespersons by persons who are engaged in a business involving the purchase, sale, or exchange of boat trailers.

(6) Persons regularly employed as salespersons by persons who are engaged in a business activity which does not involve the purchase, sale, or exchange of vehicles, except incidentally in connection with the purchase, sale, or exchange of vehicles of a type not subject to registration under this code, boat trailers, or midget autos or racers advertised as being built exclusively for use by children.

(7) Persons licensed as a vehicle dealer under this code doing business as a sole ownership or member of a partnership or a stockholder and director of a corporation or a member and manager of a limited liability company licensed as a vehicle dealer under this code. However, those persons shall engage in the activities of a salesperson, as defined in this section, exclusively on behalf of the sole ownership or partnership or corporation or limited liability company in which they own an interest or stock, and those persons owning stock shall be directors of the corporation; otherwise, they are vehicle salespersons and subject to Article 2 (commencing with Section 11800) of Chapter 4 of Division 5.

(8) Persons regularly employed as salespersons by a vehicle dealer authorized to do business in California under Section 11700.1 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 92.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

675.5.

A “vehicle verifier” is a person not expressly excluded by Section 675.6 who inspects, records, documents, and submits to the department, or its authorized representative, such proof of vehicle identification as may be required by the department for the purpose of registering or transferring the ownership of vehicles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 700.)
-------------------------------------------

675.6.

(a) “Vehicle verifier” does not include any of the following:

(1) A peace officer.

(2) An authorized employee of the department.

(3) An agent of the National Insurance Crime Bureau.

(4) An employee of an organization certified under the provisions of Part 5 (commencing with Section 12140) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code whose duties require or authorize the verification of vehicles.

(b) Any person
 specified in subdivision (a) may perform the duties of a vehicle verifier without obtaining the special permit required in Section 11300.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 198, Sec. 17.   (AB 3246)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

676.

“Year-round registration” is a system whereby the director designates a date for the expiration of registration of a vehicle and renewal thereof in order to equalize the volume of such renewals throughout the year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 889.)
-------------------------------------------

676.5.

A “water tender vehicle” is a vehicle designed to carry not less than 1,500 gallons of water and used primarily for transporting and delivering water to be applied by other vehicles or pumping equipment at fire emergency scenes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91, Sec. 169.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

680.

(a) A “youth bus” is any bus, other than a schoolbus, designed for and when actually carrying not more than 16 persons and the driver, used to transport children at or below the 12th-grade level directly from a public or private school to an organized nonschool-related youth activity within 25 miles of the school or directly from a location which provides the organized nonschool-related youth activity to a public or private school within 25 miles of that location.

(b) In addition to the destinations specified in subdivision (a), a youth bus may also be used to transport children at or below the 12th-grade level to or from their place of residence if the driver has met the requirements of Section 12523 and received additional instruction and training approved by the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 774, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

681.

(a) “Real ID driver’s license or identification card” means a driver’s license or identification card that has been issued by a state that has been certified by the Department of Homeland Security to be in compliance with the requirements of the Real ID Act of 2005 (Public Law 109-13) and the regulations adopted pursuant to the act.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2018.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 339, Sec. 3.   (SB 838)   Effective September 13, 2016.   Section operative January 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 2. ADMINISTRATION [1500. - 3093.]



CHAPTER 1. The Department of Motor Vehicles [1500. - 1825.]



  ARTICLE 1. Organization of Department [1500. - 1507.]

1500.

(a) There is in the Transportation Agency the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(b) Whenever the term “Business, Transportation and Housing Agency” appears within the Vehicle Code, it shall refer to the Transportation Agency, and whenever the term “Secretary of Business, Transportation and Housing” appears within the Vehicle Code, it shall refer to the Secretary of Transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 517.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

1501.

The department is the successor to and is hereby vested with all of the powers, duties, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction now or hereafter vested by law in the Department of Motor Vehicles, the Motor Vehicle Department, the Motor Vehicle Department of California, the Division of Motor Vehicles of the Department of Finance, the Division of Motor Vehicles of the Department of Public Works, and all other state agencies of similar designation, or in the several heads, members, officers, and employees of each thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1502.

The department has possession and control of all records, books, papers, offices, equipment, moneys, funds, appropriations, and all other property, real or personal, now or hereafter held for the benefit or use of any state agency mentioned in Section 1501.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1503.

Except as in this division otherwise provided, the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing at Section 11150) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall govern and apply to the conduct of the department in every respect the same as if the provisions were set forth in this code, and wherever in that chapter the term “head of the department” or similar designation occurs, for the purposes of this division, it shall mean the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1504.

The department is under the control of a civil executive officer known as the Director of Motor Vehicles. The director shall be appointed by, and hold office at the pleasure of, the Governor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 268, Sec. 32.2.   Effective June 29, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

1505.

The director, with the approval of the Governor and the Secretary of Transportation, shall organize the department in a manner that he or she may deem necessary to conduct the work of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 518.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

1507.

The director may appoint and, in accordance with law fix the salaries of:

(a) A deputy director.

(b) Such other officers, deputies, technical experts, and employees as may be necessary for the proper discharge of the duties of the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Powers and Duties [1650. - 1685.1.]

1650.

The director shall administer and enforce the provisions of this code relating to the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1651.

(a) The director may adopt and enforce rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this code relating to the department.

(b) Rules and regulations shall be adopted, amended, or repealed in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 594, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1651.2.

Whenever in the judgment of the department, any person has engaged, or is about to engage, in any acts or practices that constitute, or will constitute, an offense against Division 5 (commencing with Section 11100) by engaging in any act subject to license requirements without having obtained a license, the department may apply to the appropriate court for an order enjoining the acts or practices, and, upon showing by the department that the person has engaged, or is about to engage, in any of those acts or practices, an injunction, restraining order, or other order that may be appropriate shall be granted by the court, including the costs incurred by the department in obtaining the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 584, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1651.3.

It is the policy of this state to recognize the training and experience that individuals gain while serving in the Armed Forces of the United States. In furtherance of this policy, the department, in conjunction with the military services of the United States, shall develop policies to assist persons who are leaving active duty to obtain commercial driver’s licenses. These policies shall not waive any requisites or examinations required by law for a commercial driver’s license. Except as otherwise authorized, these policies shall specify how this
 training and experience may be used to obtain these licenses. The department shall consult with the Department of Veterans Affairs before adopting these policies. The department shall perform the duties required by this section within existing budgetary resources of the agency within which the department operates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 47, Sec. 1.   (AB 2141)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1651.5.

(a) The director may assign or reassign dates for the expiration of registration for a vehicle registered pursuant to this code. The director may establish a registration year for any vehicle consisting of any period from seven months to 18 months, inclusive, with subsequent renewals being required at yearly intervals thereafter. The director shall assign an expiration date of the last day of the calendar month to all trailers and to all motor vehicles subject to additional fees under the provisions of Section 9400. Any vehicle being registered on a quarterly basis shall be assigned or reassigned an expiration date of December 31 for the registration year. The director shall have the authority to exclude from year-round registration any type of vehicle that the director deems appropriate for exclusion.

(b) In order to implement a year-round registration for vehicles registered pursuant to the International Registration Plan as described in Article 4 (commencing with Section 8050) of Chapter 4 of Division 3, the director, on or before January 1, 2009, shall assign or reassign a date for the expiration of registration of those vehicles described in this subdivision and may utilize the applicable practices and procedures set forth under subdivision (a) in order to implement this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 169, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1652.

(a) The department shall prescribe and provide suitable forms of applications, certificates of ownership, registration cards, drivers’ licenses, and all other forms requisite or deemed necessary for the purposes of this code and shall prepay all transportation charges thereon.

(b) The department may require that any application or document filed with the department be signed and submitted under penalty of perjury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 830, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1653.

The department shall examine and determine the genuineness and regularity of every application or document filed with it under this code and may require additional information or reject any such application or document if not satisfied of the genuineness and regularity thereof or the truth of any statement contained therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 58.)
-------------------------------------------

1653.5.

(a) Each form prescribed by the department for use by an applicant for the issuance or renewal by the department of a driver’s license or identification card pursuant to Division 6 (commencing with Section 12500) shall contain a section for the applicant’s social security account number.

(b) Each form prescribed by the department for use by an applicant for the issuance, renewal, or transfer of the registration or certificate of title to a vehicle shall contain a section for the applicant’s driver’s license or identification card number.

(c) Except as provided in Section 12801, a person who submits to the department a form that, pursuant to subdivision (a), contains a section for the applicant’s
 social security account number, or pursuant to subdivision (b), the applicant’s driver’s license or identification card number, if any, shall furnish the appropriate number in the space provided.

(d) Except as provided in Section 12801, the department shall not complete an application that does not include the applicant’s social security account number or driver’s license or identification card number as required under subdivision (c).

(e) An applicant’s social security account number shall not be included by the department on a driver’s license, identification card, registration, certificate of title, or any other document issued by the department.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, information regarding an applicant’s social security account number, or ineligibility for a social security number, obtained by the
 department pursuant to this section, is not a public record and shall not be disclosed by the department except for any of the following purposes:

(1) Responding to a request for information from an agency operating pursuant to, and carrying out the provisions of, Part A (Block Grants to States for Temporary Assistance for Needy Families), or Part D (Child Support and Establishment of Paternity), of Subchapter IV of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) Implementation of Section 12419.10 of the Government Code.

(3) Responding to information requests from the Franchise Tax Board for the purpose of tax administration.

(4) Responding to information requests from the Employment Development Department for purposes relating to tax
 administration and ensuring compliance with family temporary disability insurance, unemployment compensation disability, and unemployment compensation benefit requirements.

(5) Participation in the State-to-State Verification Service, or any successor system, operated by the American Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators, for the sole purpose of verifying and exchanging driver’s license, identification card, and driver history records with participating jurisdictions.

(g) This section shall become inoperative on the effective date of a final judicial determination made by any court of appellate jurisdiction that any provision of the act that added this section, or its application, either in whole or in part, is enjoined, found unconstitutional, or held invalid for any
 reason. The department shall post this information on its internet website.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 14, Sec. 11) by Stats. 2026, Ch. 82, Sec. 10.   (SB 169)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subdivision (g).    See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 11 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 82.)
-------------------------------------------

1653.5.

(a) Each form prescribed by the department for use by an applicant for the issuance or renewal by the department of a driver’s license or identification card pursuant to Division 6 (commencing with Section 12500) shall contain a section for the applicant’s social security account number.

(b) Each form prescribed by the department for use by an applicant for the issuance, renewal, or transfer of the registration or certificate of title to a vehicle shall contain a section for the applicant’s driver’s license or identification card number.

(c) A person who submits to the department a form that, pursuant to subdivision (a), contains a section for the applicant’s social security account number, or
 pursuant to subdivision (b), the applicant’s driver’s license or identification card number, if any, shall furnish the appropriate number in the space provided.

(d) The department shall not complete an application that does not include the applicant’s social security account number or driver’s license or identification card number as required under subdivision (c).

(e) An applicant’s social security account number shall not be included by the department on a driver’s license, identification card, registration, certificate of title, or any other document issued by the department.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, information regarding an applicant’s social security account number, obtained by the department pursuant to this section, is not a public record and shall not be disclosed by the department except for any of
 the following purposes:

(1) Responding to a request for information from an agency operating pursuant to, and carrying out the provisions of, Part A (Block Grants to States for Temporary Assistance for Needy Families), or Part D (Child Support and Establishment of Paternity), of Subchapter IV of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(2) Implementation of Section 12419.10 of the Government Code.

(3) Responding to information requests from the Franchise Tax Board for the purpose of tax administration.

(4) Responding to information requests from the Employment Development Department for purposes relating to tax administration and ensuring compliance with family
 temporary disability insurance, unemployment compensation disability, and unemployment compensation benefit requirements.

(5) Participation in the State-to-State Verification Service, or any successor system, operated by the American Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators, for the sole purpose of verifying and exchanging driver’s license, identification card, and driver history records with participating jurisdictions.

(g) This section shall become operative on the effective date of a final judicial determination made by any court of appellate jurisdiction that any provision of the act that added this section, or its application, either in whole or in part, is enjoined, found unconstitutional, or held invalid for any reason. The department shall post this information on its
 internet website.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 168) by Stats. 2026, Ch. 82, Sec. 11.   (SB 169)   Effective July 13, 2026.   Section conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1654.

The director may purchase or lease such real estate and erect such buildings as the department or any of its divisions require, subject to the approval of the Department of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

1655.

(a) The director and deputy director of the department, the Deputy Director, Investigations Division, the Chief, Field Investigations Branch, and the investigators of the department, including rank-and-file, supervisory, and management personnel, shall have the powers of peace officers for the purpose of enforcing those provisions of law committed to the administration of the department or enforcing the law on premises occupied by the department.

(b) Any person designated in subdivision (a) may inspect any vehicle of a type required to be registered under this code, or any component part thereof, in any garage, repair shop, parking lot, used car lot, automobile dismantler’s lot, steel mill, scrap metal processing facility, or other establishment engaged in the business of selling, repairing, or dismantling vehicles, or reducing vehicles or the integral parts thereof to their component materials for the purpose of investigating the title and registration of the vehicle, inspecting wrecked or dismantled vehicles, or locating stolen vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 615, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1656.

The department shall publish on its internet website a synopsis or summary of the laws regulating the operation of vehicles and the use of the highways.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 82, Sec. 12.   (SB 169)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1656.1.

The Department of Justice shall, in conjunction with the department and the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, develop and create a video demonstrating the proper conduct by a peace officer and an individual during a traffic stop. The department shall post this video on its internet website.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 332, Sec. 2.   (AB 2537)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1656.2.

(a) The department shall prepare and publish a printed summary describing the penalties for noncompliance with Sections 16000 and 16028, which shall be included with each motor vehicle registration, registration renewal, and transfer of registration and with each driver’s license and license renewal. The printed summary may contain, but is not limited to, the following wording:

“IMPORTANT FACTS ABOUT ENFORCEMENT OF CALIFORNIA’S COMPULSORY FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY LAWCalifornia law requires every driver to carry written evidence of valid automobile liability insurance, a $35,000 bond, a $35,000 cash deposit, or a certificate of
 self-insurance that has been issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles.
You must provide evidence of financial responsibility when you renew the registration of a motor vehicle, and after you are cited by a peace officer for a traffic violation or are involved in any traffic accident. The law requires that you provide the officer with the name and address of your insurer and the policy identification number. Your insurer will provide written evidence of this number. Failure to provide evidence of your financial responsibility can result in fines of up to $500 and loss of your driver’s license. Falsification of evidence can result in fines of up to $750 or 30 days in jail, or both, in addition to a one-year suspension of driving privileges.
Under existing California law, if you are involved in an
 accident that results in damages of over $1,000 to the property of any person or in any injury or fatality, you must file a report of the accident with the Department of Motor Vehicles within 10 days of the accident. If you fail to file a report or fail to provide evidence of financial responsibility on the report, your driving privilege will be suspended for up to four years. Your suspension notice will notify you of the department’s action and of your right to a hearing. Your suspension notice will also inform you that if you request a hearing, it must be conducted within 30 days of your written request, and that a decision is to be rendered within 15 days of the conclusion of the hearing.”
(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2017.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 19) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 451, Sec. 20.   (SB 491)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative January 1, 2017, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1656.3.

(a) The department shall include within the California Driver’s Handbook, as specified in Section 1656, information regarding each of the following:

(1) Rail transit safety.

(2) Abandonment or dumping of any animal on a highway.

(3) The importance of respecting the right-of-way of others, particularly pedestrians, bicycle riders, and motorcycle riders.

(4) A person’s civil rights during a traffic stop. The information shall address the extent and limitations of a peace officer’s authority during a traffic stop and the legal rights of drivers and passengers, including,
 but not limited to, the right to file complaints against a peace officer. The information to be included in the handbook shall be developed by the civil rights section of the Department of Justice in consultation with the Department of Motor Vehicles, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, and civil rights organizations, including community-based organizations.

(5) The requirement that a peace officer disclose the reason for a traffic or pedestrian stop before engaging in questioning related to a criminal investigation or traffic violation, unless the officer reasonably believes that withholding the reason for the stop is necessary to protect life or property from imminent threat, and the requirement for the officer to document the reason for the stop on any citation or police report resulting from the stop.

(b) In
 order to minimize costs, the information referred to in paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (a) shall be initially included at the earliest opportunity when the handbook is otherwise revised or reprinted.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 805, Sec. 4.   (AB 2773)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1656.4.

(a) The department, in consultation with the Department of Consumer Affairs, shall make available on its Internet web site, on or before July 1, 1997, information to assist consumers who plan to purchase a vehicle or who have purchased a vehicle. The information shall, at a minimum, contain the names, addresses, electronic addresses, and telephone numbers of all of the following:

(1) State and federal government agencies that deal with consumer affairs and vehicles.

(2) Vehicle arbitration services.

(3) Consumer organizations that provide information and direct assistance to consumers with vehicle concerns.

(b) Money deposited in the Consumer Fraud Protection Program Fund shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the consumer protection activities of the department, including, but not limited to, expenditures by the department to comply with the requirements specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 722, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1656.5.

(a) The Legislature finds that the department, by virtue of its interaction with millions of California drivers and vehicle owners each year, represents a valuable resource for the disbursement of important public safety and consumer information.

(b) The department may enter into a contract with a private vendor for the purpose of acquiring and utilizing message display systems. These systems may be used on the department’s mailings or other property owned, leased, or controlled by the department. The information displayed shall be of appropriate benefit to the motoring public and the state’s consumers, as determined by the department.
